District of Columbia statutes.
31-5002

Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1)

The term “Mayor” means the Mayor of the District of Columbia or his designated agent.

(2)

The term “basic property insurance” means insurance against direct loss to property caused by perils as defined and limited in the standard fire policy and extended coverage endorsement thereon, as approved by the Commissioner.

(3)

The term “environmental hazard” means any hazardous condition that might give rise to loss under an insurance contract, but which is beyond the control of the property owner.

(3A)

The term “homeowner’s insurance” means insurance for residential property that provides a combination of coverages, including fire, extended coverage, vandalism and malicious mischief, burglary, theft, and personal liability. The term shall include a policy of insurance which is limited to basic market value, repair cost, or actual cash value contracts for owner-occupants of one-to-four-family dwellings as approved by the Commissioner.

(4)

The term “inspection bureau” means any rating bureau or other organization designated by the Mayor to perform inspections to determine the condition of the properties for which basic property insurance or homeowner’s insurance is sought.

(5)

The terms “Industry Placement Facility” and “Facility” mean the facility consisting of all insurers licensed to write and engaged in writing basic property insurance or homeowner’s insurance (including homeowners and commercial multiperil policies) within the District of Columbia to assist agents, brokers, and applicants in securing basic property insurance or homeowner’s insurance.

(6)

The term “premiums written” means gross direct premiums charged with respect to property in the District of Columbia on all policies of basic property insurance and the basic property insurance premium components of all multiperil policies, less all premiums and dividends returned, paid, or credited to policyholders or the unused or unabsorbed portions of premiums deposits.

(7)

The term “property owner” means any person having an insurable interest in real, personal, or mixed real and personal property.

Aug. 1, 1968, 82 Stat. 568, Pub. L. 90-448, title XII, § 1203
Mar. 27, 2003, D.C. Law 14-251, § 2(b), 50 DCR 222
This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to the District of Columbia Council and to a Commissioner of the District of Columbia. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.
D.C. Law 14-251 rewrote par. (2); added par. (3A); and substituted “basic property insurance or homeowner’s insurance” for “basic property insurance” in pars. (4) and (5).
1973 Ed., § 35-1702.
1981 Ed., § 35-1802.

Department of Insurance abolished: The Department of Insurance, including the Superintendent, was abolished and the functions thereof transferred to the Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia by Reorganization Plan No. 5 of 1952. Reorganization Order No. 43, dated June 23, 1953, as amended, established, under the direction and control of a Commissioner, a Department of Insurance headed by a Superintendent. The Order provided for the organization of the Department, abolished the previously existing Department of Insurance, and provided that all functions and positions of the previous Department would be transferred to the new Department of Insurance, including the duties, powers, and authorities of all officers and employees; and that all personnel, property, records and unexpended balances relating to the functions and positions transferred would also be transferred to the new Department. The executive functions of the Board of Commissioners were transferred to the Commissioner of the District of Columbia by § 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967. The functions of the Superintendent of Insurance were transferred to the Department of Consumer and Regulatory Affairs by Reorganization Plan No. 1 of 1983, effective March 31, 1983. Pursuant to the provisions of D.C. Law 11-268, the Department of Insurance and Securities Regulation was established and the duties of the Superintendent of Insurance and the Insurance Administration were assumed by the Commissioner of Insurance and Securities and the Insurance Administration in the Department of Consumer and Regulatory Affairs was abolished.

Delegation of functions: Reorganization Order No. 43, as amended August 12, 1968, delegated to the Superintendent of Insurance the functions vested in the Mayor by this chapter.